District of Columbia statutes.
29-1207.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Constituent statutory trust” means a statutory trust that is party to a merger.

(2)

“Governing law” means the law that governs the organization’s internal affairs.

(3)

(A)

“Organization” means:

(i)

A common-law trust that does not have a predominantly donative purpose;

(ii)

General partnership, including a limited liability partnership;

(iii)

Limited partnership, including a limited liability limited partnership;

(iv)

Limited liability company;

(v)

Corporation; or

(vi)

Foreign statutory trust.

(B)

The term “organization” shall include a domestic or foreign organization whether or not organized for profit.

(4)

“Organizational documents” means the records that create an organization and determine its internal governance and the relations among the persons that own it, have an interest in it, or are members of it.

(5)

“Surviving organization” means an organization into which one or more other organizations are merged, whether the surviving organization preexisted the merger or was created by the merger.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 701 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.